fo/src/support/hyphen/ushyphmax.tex
    % ushyphmax.tex -- patterns for increased hyphenation pattern memory
    % (say 12000).
    % 
    % Copyright (C) 1990, 2004 Gerard D.C. Kuiken.
    % Copying and distribution of this file, with or without modification,
    % are permitted in any medium without royalty provided the copyright
    % notice and this notice are preserved.
    % 
    % Needs extended pattern memory.
    % Hyphenation trie becomes 7192 with 377 ops.
    % 
    % These patterns are based on the Hyphenation Exception Log
    % published in TUGboat, Volume 10 (1989), No. 3, pp. 337-341,
    % and a large number of incorrectly hyphenated words not yet published.
    % If added to Liang's before the closing bracket } of \patterns,
    % the patterns run errorfree as far as known at this moment.
    % 
    % These patterns find all admissible hyphens of the words in
    % the Exception Log.  ushyph2.tex is a smaller set.
    % 
    % Please send bugs or suggestions to tex-live (at) tug.org.
    % 
    % Patterns of March 1, 1990.
.con5gr
.de5riva
.dri5v4
.eth1y6l1
.eu4ler
.ev2
.ever5si5b
.ga4s1om1
.ge4ome
.ge5ot1
.he3mo1
.he3p6a
.he3roe
.in5u2t
.kil2n3i
.ko6r1te1
.le6ices
.me4ga1l
.met4ala
.mim5i2c1
.mi1s4ers
.ne6o3f
.noe1th
.non1e2m
.poly1s
.post1am
.pre1am
.rav5en1o
.semi5
.sem4ic
.semid6
.semip4
.semir4
.sem6is4
.semiv4
.sph6in1
.spin1o
.ta5pes1tr
.te3legr
.to6pog
.to2q
.un3at5t
.un5err5
.vi2c3ar
.we2b1l
.re1e4c
a5bolic
a2cabl
af6fish
am1en3ta5b
anal6ys
ano5a2c
ans5gr
ans3v
anti1d
an3ti1n2
anti1re
a4pe5able
ar3che5t
ar2range
as5ymptot
ath3er1o1s
at6tes.
augh4tl
au5li5f
av3iou
back2er.
ba6r1onie
ba1thy
bbi4t
be2vie
bi5d2if
bil2lab
bio5m
bi1orb
bio1rh
b1i3tive
blan2d1
blin2d1
blon2d2
bor1no5
bo2t1u1l
brus4q
bus6i2er
bus6i2es
buss4ing
but2ed.
but4ted
cad5e1m
cat1a1s2
4chs.
chs3hu
chie5vo
cig3a3r
cin2q
cle4ar
co6ph1o3n
cous2ti
cri3tie
croc1o1d
cro5e2co
c2tro3me6c
1cu2r1ance
2d3alone
data1b
dd5a5b
d2d5ib
de4als.
de5clar1
de2c5lina
de3fin3iti
de2mos
des3ic
de2tic
dic1aid
dif5fra
3di1methy
di2ren
di2rer
2d1lead
2d1li2e
3do5word
dren1a5l
drif2t1a
d1ri3pleg5
drom3e5d
d3tab
du2al.
du1op1o1l
ea4n3ies
e3chas
edg1l
ed1uling
eli2t1is
e1loa
en1dix
eo3grap
1e6p3i3neph1
e2r3i4an.
e3spac6i
eth1y6l1ene
5eu2clid1
feb1rua
fermi1o
3fich
fit5ted.
fla1g6el
flow2er.
3fluor
gen2cy.
ge3o1d
ght1we
g1lead
get2ic.
4g1lish
5glo5bin
1g2nac
gnet1ism
gno5mo
g2n1or.
g2noresp
2g1o4n3i1za
graph5er.
griev1
g1utan
hair1s
ha2p3ar5r
hatch1
hex2a3
hite3sid
h3i5pel1a4
hnau3z
ho6r1ic.
h2t1eou
hypo1tha
id4ios
ifac1et
ign4it
ignit1er
i4jk
im3ped3a
infra1s2
i5nitely.
irre6v3oc
i1tesima
ith5i2l
itin5er5ar
janu3a
japan1e2s
je1re1m
1ke6ling
1ki5netic
1kovian
k3sha
la4c3i5e
lai6n3ess
lar5ce1n
l3chai
l3chil6d1
lead6er.
lea4s1a
1lec3ta6b
le3g6en2dre
1le1noid
lith1o5g
ll1fl
l2l3ish
l5mo3nell
lo1bot1o1
lo2ges.
load4ed.
load6er.
l3tea
lth5i2ly
lue1p
1lunk3er
1lum5bia.
3lyg1a1mi
ly5styr
ma1la1p
m2an.
man3u1sc
mar1gin1
medi2c
med3i3cin
medio6c1
me3gran3
m2en.
3mi3da5b
3milita
mil2l1ag
mil5li5li
mi6n3is.
mi1n2ut1er
mi1n2ut1est
m3ma1b
5maph1ro1
5moc1ra1t
mo5e2las
mol1e5c
mon4ey1l
mono3ch
mo4no1en
moro6n5is
mono1s6
moth4et2
m1ou3sin
m5shack2
mu2dro
mul2ti5u
n3ar4chs.
n3ch2es1t
ne3back
2ne1ski
n1dieck
nd3thr
nfi6n3ites
4n5i4an.
nge5nes
ng1ho
ng1spr
nk3rup
n5less
5noc3er1os
nom1a6l
nom5e1no
n1o1mist
non1eq
non1i4so
5nop1oly.
no1vemb
ns5ceiv
ns4moo
ntre1p
obli2g1
o3chas
odel3li
odit1ic
oerst2
oke1st
o3les3ter
oli3gop1o1
o1lo3n4om
o3mecha6
onom1ic
o3norma
o3no2t1o3n
o3nou
op1ism.
or4tho3ni4t
orth1ri
or5tively
o4s3pher
o5test1er
o5tes3tor
oth3e1o1s
ou3ba3do
o6v3i4an.
oxi6d1ic
pal6mat
parag6ra4
par4a1le
param4
para3me
pee2v1
phi2l3ant
phi5lat1e3l
pi2c1a3d
pli2c1ab
pli5nar
poin3ca
1pole.
poly1e
po3lyph1ono
1prema3c
pre1neu
pres2pli
pro2cess
proc3i3ty.
pro2g1e
3pseu2d
pseu3d6o3d2
pseu3d6o3f2
pto3mat4
p5trol3
pu5bes5c
quain2t1e
qu6a3si3
quasir6
quasis6
quin5tes5s
qui3v4ar
r1abolic
3rab1o1loi
ra3chu
r3a3dig
radi1o6g
r2amen
3ra4m5e1triz
ra3mou
ra5n2has
ra1or
r3bin1ge
re2c3i1pr
rec5t6ang
re4t1ribu
r3ial.
riv1o1l
6rk.
rk1ho
r1krau
6rks.
r5le5qu
ro1bot1
ro5e2las
ro5epide1
ro3mesh
ro1tron
r3pau5li
rse1rad1i
r1thou
r1treu
r1veil
rz1sc
sales3c
sales5w
5sa3par5il
sca6p1er
sca2t1ol
s4chitz
schro1ding1
1sci2utt
scrap4er.
scy4th1
sem1a1ph
se3mes1t
se1mi6t5ic
sep3temb
shoe1st
sid2ed.
side5st
side5sw
si5resid
sky1sc
3slova1kia
3s2og1a1my
so2lute
3s2pace
1s2pacin
spe3cio
spher1o
spi2c1il
spokes5w
sports3c
sports3w
s3qui3to
s2s1a3chu1
ss3hat
s2s3i4an.
s5sign5a3b
1s2tamp
s2t1ant5shi
star3tli
sta1ti
st5b
1stor1ab
strat1a1g
strib5ut
st5scr
stu1pi4d1
styl1is
su2per1e6
1sync
1syth3i2
swimm6
5tab1o1lism
ta3gon.
talk1a5
t1a1min
t6ap6ath
5tar2rh
tch1c
tch3i1er
t1cr
teach4er.
tele2g
tele1r6o
3ter1gei
ter2ic.
t3ess2es
tha4l1am
tho3don
th1o5gen1i
tho1k2er
thy4l1an
thy3sc
2t3i4an.
ti2n3o1m
t1li2er
tolo2gy
tot3ic
trai3tor1
tra1vers
travers3a3b
treach1e
tr4ial.
3tro1le1um
trof4ic.
tro3fit
tro1p2is
3trop1o5les
3trop1o5lis
t1ro1pol3it
tsch3ie
ttrib1ut1
turn3ar
t1wh
ty2p5al
ua3drati
uad1ratu
u5do3ny
uea1m
u2r1al.
uri4al.
us2er.
v1ativ
v1oir5du1
va6guer
vaude3v
1verely.
v1er1eig
ves1tite
vi1vip3a3r
voice1p
waste3w6a2
wave1g4
w3c
week1n
wide5sp
wo4k1en
wrap3aro
writ6er.
x1q
xquis3
y5che3d
ym5e5try
y1stro
yes5ter1y
z3ian.
z3o1phr
z2z3w
